Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-5312.01
Existing rules, regulations, licenses, certificates, forms of approval, suits, other proceedings; how treated.

(1) All rules and regulations adopted prior to July 1, 2021, under the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act shall continue to be effective to the extent not in conflict with the changes made by Laws 2021, LB148.

(2) All licenses, certificates, or other forms of approval issued prior to July 1, 2021, in accordance with the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act shall remain valid as issued for purposes of the changes made by Laws 2021, LB148, unless revoked or otherwise terminated by law.

(3) Any suit, action, or other proceeding, judicial or administrative, which was lawfully commenced prior to July 1, 2021, under the Nebraska Safe Drinking Water Act shall be subject to the provisions of the act as they existed prior to July 1, 2021.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1230;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 80.